csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAIO_Cnj_VAIO.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaaweyaan
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaaweyan
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: adaaweyaang
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: adaaweyang
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: adaaweyeg
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawed
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewaad
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: adaawenid
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+0Sg/0Pl: adaaweng
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiwaan
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiwan
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiwaang
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiwang
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiweg
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesig
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesigwaa
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesinig
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesing
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaaweyaambaan
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaaweyamban
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: adaaweyaangiban
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: adaaweyangiban
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [adaaweyegiban,adaaweyegoban]
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawepan
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewaapan
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: adaawenipan
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+0Sg/0Pl: adaawengiban
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiwaambaan
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiwamban
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiwaangiban
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiwangiban
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [adaawesiwegiban,adaawesiwegoban]
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesigoban
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesigwaaban
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesinigoban
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesingiban
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewaanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewaangen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewangen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewegwen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawegwen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewaagwen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: adaawenigwen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewiingen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwaanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwaangen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwangen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwegwen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiigwen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwaagwen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiinigwen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwiingen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewaambaanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewambanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewaangibanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewangibanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [adaawewegibanen,adaawewegobanen]
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawegobanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewaagobanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: adaawenigobanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+X+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewiingibanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwaambaanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwambanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwaangibanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwangibanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [adaawesiiwegibanen,adaawesiiwegobanen]
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiigobanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwaagobanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiinigobanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+X+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwiingibanen
